nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinske møbler > Medisinvogner > Krasjvogner: Anestesi-krasjvogner; Nød-krasjvogner; Isolasjons-krasjvogner; Pediatriske krasjvogner
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療用家具 > 医療用ワゴン > 救急ワゴン: 麻酔クラッシュカート; 緊急用クラッシュカート; アイソレーションクラッシュカート; 小児用クラッシュカート
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Sairaalakalusteet > Sairaalavaunut > Hoitovaunut: Anestesiavaunut; Ensihoitovaunut; Eristysvaunut; Pediatriset vaunut
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Sjukhusmöbler > Sjukhusvagnar > Akutvagnar: Akutvagnar för anestesi; Akutvagnar för akutmottagning; Akutvagnar för isolering; Pediatriska akutvagnar
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícky nábytok > Zdravotnícke vozíky > Pohotovostné vozíky: Pohotovostné vozíky na anestéziu; Pohotovostné vozíky JIS; Izolačné pohotovostné vozíky; Detské pohotovostné vozíky
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Mobiliário médico > Carrinhos médicos > Carrinhos de emergência: Carrinhos de emergência para anestesia; Carrinhos para emergências; Carrinhos de emergência de isolamento; Carrinhos de emergência pediátricos
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Arredamento medico > Carrelli distribuzione farmaci > Carrelli di emergenza: Carrelli per anestesia; Carrelli per emergenze; Carrelli di isolamento; Carrelli di emergenza pediatrici
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Møbler til hospitaler og læger > Medicinvogne > Hjertestopvogne: Hjertestopvogne til anæstesi; Hjertestopvogne til nødsituationer; Hjertestopvogne til isolation; Hjertestopvogne til børn
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Meble medyczne > Wózki medyczne > Wózki reanimacyjne: Wózki reanimacyjne anestezjologiczne; Wózki reanimacyjne do oddziałów ratunkowych; Wózki reanimacyjne do izolatek; Pediatryczne wózki reanimacyjne
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицинско обзавеждане > Медицински колички > Колички за медицинска помощ: Анестезиологични колички; Колички за спешна медицинска помощ; Колички с медицински консумативи; Педиатрични медицински колички
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료용 가구 > 의료용 카트 > 크래시 카트: 마취용 크래시 카트; 응급용 크래시 카트; 격리용 크래시 카트; 소아과용 크래시 카트
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinski namještaj > Medicinska kolica > Kolica za oživljavanje: Kolica za anesteziju; Kolica za hitne slučajeve; Izolacijska kolica; Pedijatrijska kolica
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Möbel > Medizinische Wagen > Reanimationswagen: Anästhesie-Notfallwagen; Notfallwagen; Isolations-Notfallwagen; Pädiatrischer Notfallwagen
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Medikal Mobilyalar > Medikal Arabalar > Acil Müdahale Arabaları: Anestezi Acil Müdahale Arabaları; Acil Durum Müdahale Arabaları; İzolasyon Müdahale Arabaları; Pediatrik Acil Müdahale Arabaları
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Furniture > Medical Carts > Crash Carts: Anesthesia Crash Carts; Emergency Crash Carts; Isolation Crash Carts; Pediatric Crash Carts
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์ทางการแพทย์ > รถเข็นทางการแพทย์ > รถเข็น: รถเข็นวางยาสลบ; รถเข็นฉุกเฉิน; รถเข็นแยก; รถเข็นช่วยชีวิตเด็ก
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικά έπιπλα > Ιατρικά καρότσια > Καρότσια ανάνηψης: Καρότσια αναισθησίας; Καρότσια έκτακτης ανάνηψης; Καρότσια ανάνηψης απομόνωσης; Παιδιατρικά καρότσια ανάνηψης
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi bútorok > Orvosi kocsik > Baleseti kocsik: Anesztéziai baleseti kocsik; Sürgősségi baleseti kocsik; Izolált baleseti kocsik; Gyermek-balesetikocsik
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинская мебель > Медицинские тележки > Реанимационные тележки: Анестезиологические реанимационные тележки; Реанимационные тележки экстренной помощи; Реанимационные тележки с СИЗ; Педиатрические реанимационные тележки
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medisch meubilair > Medicijnkarren > Reanimatiekarren: Anesthesie-reanimatiekarren; Noodreanimatiekarren; Isolatie-reanimatiekarren; Kinderreanimatiekarren
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinsko pohištvo > Medicinski vozički > Vozički za nujne primere: Vozički za nujne primere z anestezijo; Vozički za nujne primere; Izolacijski vozički za nujne primere; Pediatrični vozički za nujne primere
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicininiai baldai > Medicininiai vežimėliai > Procedūriniai vežimėliai: Anestezijos procedūriniai vežimėliai; Reanimacijos procedūriniai vežimėliai; Izoliaciniai procedūriniai vežimėliai; Pediatriniai procedūriniai vežimėliai
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Lékařský nábytek > Lékařské vozíky > Vozíky na léky: Anesteziologické vozíky; Vozíky na léky pro pohotovost; Izolační zdravotnické vozíky; Pediatrické vozíky na léky
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医用家具 > 医用推车 > 医用急救推车: 麻醉急救车; 紧急救护车; 隔离急救车; 儿科急救车
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療家具 > 醫療推車 > 急救推車: 麻醉急救推車; 緊急救護推車; 隔離急救推車; 兒科急救推車
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Móveis médicos > Carrinhos médicos > Carrinhos de emergência: Carrinhos de emergência para anestesia; Carrinhos para emergências; Carrinhos de emergência para isolamento; Carrinhos de emergência pediátricos
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Mobiliario médico > Carros médicos > Carros de emergencias: Carros de anestesia; Carros de emergencia; Carros de emergencia para aislamiento; Carros de emergencia pediátricos
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Trang bị y tế > Xe đẩy y tế > Xe đẩy dụng cụ cấp cứu: Xe đẩy dụng cụ gây mê; Xe đẩy cấp cứu; Xe đẩy dụng cụ cách ly; Xe đẩy dụng cụ khoa nhi
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Meubles pour le secteur médical > Chariots médicaux > Chariots d’urgence: Chariots d’urgence d’anesthésie; Chariots de secours; Chariots d’isolation; Chariots d’urgence pédiatriques
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Mobilier medical > Cărucioare medicale > Cărucioare resuscitare: Cărucioare resuscitare anestezie; Cărucioare resuscitare urgențe; Cărucioare resuscitare izolare; Cărucioare resuscitare copii